pt-BR: Comercial e industrial > Odontologia: Cimento odontológico; Instrumentos odontológicos; Pasta profilática
ru: Бизнес и промышленность > Стоматология: Стоматологические цементы; Стоматологические инструменты; Профилактические стоматологические пасты
zh-CN: 商业/工业 > 牙科: 牙科粘固剂; 牙科工具; 牙科专用清洁膏
th: ธุรกิจและอุตสาหกรรม > ทันตกรรม: ซีเมนต์ทันตกรรม; เครื่องมือทันตกรรม; ครีมฟอกฟันขาว
en: Business & Industrial > Dentistry: Dental Cement; Dental Tools; Prophy Paste
tr: İş ve Endüstri > Diş Hekimliği: Diş Sementi; Dişçi Aletleri; Polisaj Macunu
de: Wirtschaft & Industrie > Zahnmedizin: Zahnzement; Zahnmedizinische Instrumente; Prophy-Paste
es: Economía e industria > Odontología: Cemento dental; Utensilios dentales; Pasta de pulido
lt-LT: Verslas ir pramonė > Odontologija: Dantų cementas; Odontologiniai įrankiai; Profilaktinė pasta
fr: Entreprise et industrie > Médecine dentaire: Ciment dentaire; Instruments dentaires; Pâte de polissage
nl: Zakelijk en industrieel > Tandheelkunde: Tandcement; Tandartsinstrumenten; Polijstpasta
zh-TW: 商業與各產業 > 牙科: 牙科用黏著劑; 牙科工具; 抛光膏
it: Commercio e industria > Odontoiatria: Cemento dentale; Strumenti da dentista; Pasta per profilassi
sv: Företag och industri > Tandläkararbete: Tandcement; Tandläkarverktyg; Polerpasta
sl-SI: Posel in industrija > Zobozdravstvo: Zobozdravstveni cement; Zobozdravstveno orodje; Profilaktična pasta
cs: Obchod a průmysl > Stomatologie: Zubní cement; Zubařské nástroje; Profylaktické pasty
hr-HR: Posao i industrija > Stomatologija: Zubni cement; Stomatološki alati; Pasta za profilaksu
ro-RO: Afaceri și sectorul industrial > Stomatologie: Ciment dentar; Instrumente dentare; Pastă lustruire
nb: Forretninger og industri > Odontologi: Tannsement; Tannverktøy; Prophypaste
ko: 비즈니스/산업 > 치과: 치과용 시멘트; 치과 도구; 치면 세척용제
pt-PT: Business e industrial > Odontologia: Cimento dentário; Ferramentas odontológicas; Pasta de profilaxia
da: Erhverv og industri > Tandlæge: Tandcement; Tandlægeredskaber; Tandpasta (profylakse)
pl: Biznes i przemysł > Stomatologia: Cement dentystyczny; Narzędzia dentystyczne; Pasty do polerowania zębów
fi: Yritys ja teollisuus > Hammashoito: Hammassementti; Hammashoitovälineet; Puhdistuspasta
vi: Kinh doanh & Công nghiệp > Nha khoa: Xi măng nha khoa; Dụng cụ nha khoa; Kem đánh bóng răng
el: Επιχειρηματικός & βιομηχανικός εξοπλισμός > Οδοντιατρική: Οδοντιατρικό τσιμέντο; Οδοντιατρικά εργαλεία; Πάστα στίλβωσης
ja: ビジネス・産業 > 歯科: 歯科用セメント; デンタルツール; プロフィーペースト
hu: Üzlet és ipar > Fogászat: Fogászati cement; Fogászati eszközök; Prophy paszta
sk-SK: Obchod a priemysel > Zubné lekárstvo: Zubný cement; Dentálne nástroje; Profylaktické pasty
bg-BG: Бизнес и промишленост > Стоматология: Стоматологичен цимент; Стоматологични инструменти; Полираща паста